Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8807
Director; disciplinary actions authorized;
powers to examine business affairs and records; notice; hearing.

(1) The director,
after notice and hearing, may place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse
to issue, renew, or reinstate a navigator registration for violation of the
Health Insurance Exchange Navigator Registration Act.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided by law, the director may examine and investigate the business affairs
and records of any navigator as such business affairs and records regard the
navigator's duties as a navigator to determine whether the navigator has engaged
or is engaging in any violation of the act.

(3) An entity navigator registration may
be suspended or revoked or renewal or reinstatement thereof may be refused
if the director finds, after notice and hearing, that an individual navigator's
violation was known by the employing or supervising entity navigator and the
violation was not reported to the director and no corrective action was undertaken.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 7.